Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 4. Licensing of Mineral Mines.

§ 45.2-1124.
License required for operation of mineral mines; term.

No person shall engage in the operation of any mineral mine within the Commonwealth without first obtaining a license from the Department. Licenses shall be in a form that the Director prescribes. The license for each mine shall be posted in a conspicuous place near the main entrance to such mine.

A license is required prior to commencement of the operation of a mine, and a separate license shall be secured for each mine operated. The Director may transfer a license to a successor operator so long as the successor operator has complied with the requirements of the Act. Every change in ownership of a mine shall be reported to the Department as provided in subsection D of §

45.2-1129

.

Each license shall be valid for a period of one year following the date of issuance, and a mine operator shall secure the renewal of a license by its anniversary date.

Within 30 days after the occurrence of any change in the information required by subsection B, the licensed operator shall notify the Department in writing of such change.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:30; 1998, c. 695; 2000, c. 974; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-1125.
Fee to accompany application for license; Mineral Mine License Fund; disposition of fees.

Each application for a mineral mine license or a renewal or transfer of a license shall be submitted to the Department, accompanied by a fee of $400 payable to the State Treasurer, except an application submitted electronically, which shall be accompanied by a fee of $330. However, any person engaged in mining sand or gravel on an area of five acres or less shall be required to pay a fee of $100, except an application submitted electronically, which shall be accompanied by a fee of $80. All such fees collected shall be retained by the Department and paid into the Mineral Mine License Fund created pursuant to subsection B.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Mineral Mine License Fund, referred to in this section as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All fees collected pursuant to subsection A shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Expenditures from the Fund shall be made solely for the purpose of acquiring or providing safety equipment, safety training, or safety education or to further the safety program in the mineral mining industry. All expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Director.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:31; 2003, cc. 542, 550; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, cc. 542 and 550, cl. 3 provides: “The Department of Mines, Minerals, and Energy shall increase the fee for filing an application to transfer gas or oil permit rights, as provided for in 4 VAC 25-150-120, to $65. Action by the Department to increase this fee shall be exempt from the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, Item 124 E, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “The application fee for a mineral mine license or a renewal or transfer of a license pursuant to § 45.1-161.292:31, Code of Virginia, shall be in the amount of $400, except applications submitted electronically, which shall be accompanied by a fee of $330. However, the fee for any person engaged in mining sand or gravel on an area of five acres or less shall be required to pay a fee of $100, except applications submitted electronically, which shall be accompanied by a fee of $80.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-1126.
Application for license.

Each application for a license shall be submitted by the person who will be the licensed operator of the mine. No application for a license or a renewal thereof is complete unless it contains the following:

The identity of the applicant. The applicant shall state (i) the name and address of the mine and its federal mine identification number, (ii) the name and address of the person with overall responsibility for operating decisions at the mine, (iii) the name and address of the person with overall responsibility for health and safety at the mine, and (iv) the federal mine identification number of every other mine in which the applicant has a 20 percent or greater ownership interest;

If the applicant is a sole proprietorship, in addition to the information required by subdivision 1, (i) his full name and address and (ii) the trade name, if any, and the full name, address of record, and telephone number of the proprietorship;

If the applicant is a partnership, in addition to the information required by subdivision 1, (i) the full name and address of each partner; (ii) the trade name, if any, and the full name and address of record and telephone number of the partnership; and (iii) the federal mine identification number of every other mine in which any partner has a 20 percent or greater ownership interest;

If the applicant is a corporation, in addition to the information required by subdivision 1, (i) the full name, address of record, and telephone number of the corporation and the state of incorporation; (ii) the full name and address of each officer and director of the corporation; (iii) the full name, address, and state of incorporation of the parent corporation if the corporation is a subsidiary corporation; and (iv) the federal mine identification numbers of every other mine in which any corporate officer has a 20 percent or greater ownership interest;

If the applicant is any organization other than a sole proprietorship, partnership, or corporation, in addition to the information required by subdivision 1, (i) the nature and type, or legal identity, of the organization; (ii) the full name, address of record, and telephone number of the organization; (iii) the name and address of each individual who has an ownership interest in the organization; (iv) the name and address of the principal organization officials or members; and (v) the federal mine identification number of every other mine in which any official or member has a 20 percent or greater ownership interest;

The name and address of any agent of the applicant with responsibility for the business operation of the mine, and any person with an ownership or leasehold interest in the minerals to be mined;

The following information about each independent contractor working at the mine: (i) the independent contractor’s trade name, business address, and business telephone number; (ii) a description of the nature of the work to be performed by the independent contractor and where at the mine the work is to be performed; (iii) the independent contractor’s MSHA identification number, if any; (iv) the independent contractor’s address of record for service of citations and other documents; (v) the names and addresses of persons with overall responsibility for operating decisions; and (vi) the names and addresses of persons with overall responsibility for the health and safety of employees;

The names and addresses of persons to be contacted in the event of an accident or other emergency at the mine;

Any information required by the Department that is relevant to an assessment of the safety and health risks likely to be associated with the operation of the mine; and

For any license renewal, the annual report required pursuant to §

45.2-1129

.

The application shall be certified as being complete and accurate by the applicant, if an individual; by the agent of a corporate applicant; or by a general partner of an applicant that is a partnership. The application shall be submitted on forms furnished or approved by the Department.

Within 30 days after the occurrence of any change in the information required by subsection A, the licensed operator shall notify the Department in writing of such change.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:32; 1998, c. 695; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1127.
Denial or revocation of license.

The Director may deny an application for, or revoke a license for, the operation of a mineral mine upon determining that the applicant, the licensed operator, or the agent of such applicant or operator has committed violations of the mine safety laws of the Commonwealth that demonstrate a pattern of willful violations resulting in an imminent danger to miners.

The Director may revoke every license issued to any person for the operation of a mineral mine and may deny every application by a person for the issuance of a license for the operation of a mineral mine if such person has been convicted of knowingly permitting a miner to work in an underground coal mine where a methane monitor or other device capable of detecting the presence of explosive gases was impaired, disturbed, disconnected, bypassed, or otherwise tampered with in violation of §

45.2-849

.

The Director may revoke every license issued to any person for the operation of a mineral mine and may deny every application by a person for the issuance of a license for the operation of a mineral mine if such person has been convicted of violating subsection A of §

45.2-856

or

45.2-857

.

Any person whose license is denied or revoked pursuant to subsection A, B, or C may bring a civil action in the circuit court of the city or county in which the mine is located for review of the decision. The commencement of such proceeding shall not, unless specifically ordered by the court, operate as a stay of the decision. The court shall promptly hear and determine the matters raised by the aggrieved party. In any such action the court shall receive the records of the Department regarding the determination and shall receive additional evidence at the request of any party. The court, basing its decision on the preponderance of the evidence, shall grant such relief as the court determines appropriate.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:33; 1998, c. 695; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1128.
Operating without license; penalty.

In addition to any other power conferred by law, the Director or his designated representative may issue an order closing any mineral mine that is operating without a license. The procedure for issuing a closure order shall be as provided in §

45.2-1158

.

Any person operating an unlicensed mineral mine is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor. Each day any person operates an unlicensed mineral mine constitutes a separate offense.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:34; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1129.
Annual reports; condition to issuance of license following transfer of ownership.

The licensed operator of each mine or his agent shall annually, by February 15, mail or deliver to the Department a report for the 12 months ending prior to the preceding January 1. Such report shall state (i) the names of the licensed operator, any agent, and their officers of the mine; (ii) the amount of minerals mined; (iii) any changes in the information required to be part of the license application by subsection A of §

45.2-1126

; and (iv) any other information, not of a private nature, that from time to time is required by the Department on forms furnished or approved by the Department.

Each independent contractor who is working or has worked at a mine during the preceding 12 months shall annually, by February 15, mail or deliver to the Department a report for the 12 months ending prior to the preceding January 1. Such report shall state (i) the independent contractor’s name and Department identification number; (ii) the number of the independent contractor’s employees who worked at each mine, listed by mine name and license number; (iii) the number of the independent contractor’s employee hours worked at each mine, listed by mine name and license number; and (iv) the lump sum amount of wages paid by the independent contractor at each mine, if such amount is above $1,000, listed by mine name and license number.

For purposes of subsection B, “independent contractor” means any (i) extraction or processing contractor, including a driller, blaster, portable crusher, or stripping or land clearing contractor; (ii) maintenance or repair contractor for mobile or stationary extraction or processing equipment, including a welder, mechanic, painter, or electrician; and (iii) construction contractor involved in mine site construction maintenance or repair, including a plant construction contractor, concrete fabricator, or equipment erector.

If the owner of a mine transfers the ownership of such mine to another person, the person transferring such ownership shall submit a report to the Department of such change and a statement of the amount of minerals produced since the January 1 prior to the date of such transfer of ownership. No license shall be issued covering such transfer of ownership until the report is furnished.

All wage information contained in any report filed with the Department pursuant to this section shall be exempt from disclosure under the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.) and shall not be published or made open to public inspection in any manner revealing the employing unit’s identity. However, such information may be disclosed to the Director or his authorized representative concerned with carrying out any provisions of this title. Wage data aggregated so as to not reveal the employing unit’s identity shall not be exempt from such disclosure.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:35; 1998, c. 695; 2000, c. 974; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1130.
Notices to Department; resumption of mining following discontinuance.

The licensed operator or his agent shall send notice of intent to abandon or discontinue the working of an underground mine for a period of 30 days, or a surface mine for a period of 60 days, to the Department at least 10 days prior to discontinuing the working of a mine with such intent, or at any time a mine becomes an inactive mine.

The licensed operator or his agent shall send to the Department 10 days’ prior notice of intent to resume the working of an inactive mine. Except for a surface mineral mine that is inspected by MSHA, the working of such mine shall not resume until a mine inspector has inspected the mine and approved it.

An emergency action necessary to preserve a mine may be undertaken without the prior notice of intent and advance inspection required by subsection B. In such event, a mine foreman shall examine the mine for hazardous conditions immediately before any miner is permitted to work. The licensed operator or his agent shall notify the Department as soon as possible after commencing an emergency action necessary to preserve the mine.

The licensed operator or his agent shall send to the Department 10 days’ prior notice of any change in the name of a mine or in the name of the operator of a mine.

The licensed operator or his agent shall send to the Department 10 days’ prior notice of the opening of a new mine.

Any notice required by this section shall be in writing and shall include the name and location of the mine and the name, mailing address, and email address of the licensed operator.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:36; 1998, c. 695; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1131.
Maps of mines required to be made; contents; extension and preservation; use by Department; release; posting of map.

Prior to commencing mining activity, the licensed operator of a mineral mine or his agent shall submit, unless already submitted, an accurate map of such mine. The scale of such map shall be stated thereon and shall be between 100 feet and 400 feet to the inch. Such map shall show the openings or excavations, shafts, slopes, entries, headings, rooms, pillars, permanent explosive magazines, permanent fuel storage facilities, and airways with darts or arrows showing direction of air currents. Such map shall also show any portion of such mine that has been abandoned and any portion of the property lines and the outcrop of the mineral of the tract of land on which the mine is located that are located within 1,000 feet of any part of the workings of such mine. For an underground mine only, such map shall show the general inclination of the mineral strata.

The licensed operator of such mine shall annually, beginning on the anniversary date of the mine permit issued pursuant to Chapter 12 (§

45.2-1200

et seq.) and continuing while the mine is in operation, cause such map to be extended so as to accurately show the progress of the workings, and the property lines and outcrop as described in subsection A, and shall forward such updated map to the Department to be kept on record, subject to the conditions stated in subsection D. If there are no changes in the information required by this section, the licensed operator shall not be required to submit an updated map to the Department.

Each map required pursuant to this section shall be filed and preserved among the records of the Department. The Department shall make such map available at a reasonable cost to any person owning, leasing, or residing on or having an equitable interest in any surface area or coal or mineral interest within 1,000 feet of such mining operation upon written proof satisfactory to the Director and upon a sworn affidavit that such person requesting a map has the required legal or equitable interest. However, the Director shall provide to such person only that portion of the map that abuts or is contiguous to the property in which such requesting party has a legal or equitable interest. In no case shall any copy of such map be made for any person who does not possess the required legal or equitable interest without the consent of the licensed operator or his agent. The Director shall promptly deliver notice of such request to the licensed operator of such mining operation.

The original version of a map required by this section, or a true copy thereof, shall be kept by the licensed operator at the active mine, open at all reasonable times for the examination and use of the mine inspector.

Copies of the maps required pursuant to this section shall be made available at a reasonable cost to the governing body of any locality in which the mine is located upon written request; however, such copies shall be provided on the condition that they not be released to any person who does not have a legal or equitable interest in any surface area or mineral interest within 1,000 feet of the mining operation without the written consent of the licensed operator or his agent. The governing body shall promptly deliver notice of any such request for a copy of a map to the licensed operator or his agent.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:37; 1998, c. 695; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1132.
When the Director may cause maps to be made; payment of expense.

If a licensed mine operator or his agent neglects or fails to furnish to the Director a copy of any map or extension thereof, as provided in §

45.2-1131

, the Director may cause a correct survey and map of such mine or extension to be made at the expense of the licensed operator of such mine. The expense of making such survey and map or extension thereof shall be recovered from such licensed operator as other debts are recoverable by a civil action.

If at any time the Director has reason to believe that a map or extension furnished pursuant to §

45.2-1131

is substantially incorrect or will not serve the purpose for which it is intended, he may have a survey and map or extension thereof made or corrected. The expense of making such survey and map or extension thereof shall be paid by the licensed operator and recovered from such licensed operator as other debts are recoverable by a civil action. However, if the map filed by the licensed operator is found to be substantially correct, the expense shall be paid by the Commonwealth.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:38; 1998, c. 695; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1133.
Making false statements; penalty.

It is unlawful for any person responsible for making any map or other data to be furnished pursuant to the Act to (i) fail to correctly show, within the limits of error, the data required or (ii) knowingly make any false statement or return in connection with such map or other data. A violation of this section is a misdemeanor, and a person convicted of violating this section shall be fined not less than $50 and not more than $200.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:39; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.